North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 35. Agreements Between North Carolina and Foreign Governments.

§ 66-280.
Agreements between North Carolina and foreign governments to be filed.

A copy of all executed memoranda of understanding and agreements of a noncommercial nature otherwise subject to disclosure under the public record laws of this State, entered into by the State of North Carolina, or any agency of the State, and a foreign government shall be filed by the State agency with the Secretary of State.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the validity or enforceability of any memoranda or agreement subject to this section shall not be affected by the failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section. Documents required to be filed with the Secretary of State under this section shall be indexed and made available to the public in accordance with Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

For purposes of this section, “foreign government” means a foreign country’s government that is recognized and accredited by the United States Department of State, and includes governmental subdivisions of that country. For purposes of this section, “agency of the State” does not include public educational institutions with respect to their educational, research, or extension activities.

History.

1999-260, s. 1.

§§ 66-281 through 66-284.

Reserved for future codification purposes.